Tables/Contraction/ko.ctb
always 읨 2456-26
always 읩 2456-12
always 읪 2456-12-3
always 읫 2456-3
always 읬 2456-3-3
always 읭 2456-2356
always 읮 2456-13
always 읯 2456-23
always 읰 2456-235
always 읱 2456-236
always 읲 2456-256
always 읳 2456-356
always 이 135
always 익 135-1
always 읶 135-1-1
always 읷 135-1-3
always 인 135-25
always 읹 135-25-13
always 읺 135-25-356
always 읻 135-35
always 일 135-2
always 읽 135-2-1
always 읾 135-2-26
always 읿 135-2-12
always 잀 135-2-3
always 잁 135-2-236
always 잂 135-2-256
always 잃 135-2-356
always 임 135-26
always 입 135-12
always 잆 135-12-3
always 잇 135-3
always 있 135-3-3
always 잉 135-2356
always 잊 135-13
always 잋 135-23
always 잌 135-235
always 잍 135-236
always 잎 135-256
always 잏 135-356
always 자 46-126
always 작 46-126-1
always 잒 46-126-1-1
always 잓 46-126-1-3
always 잔 46-126-25
always 잕 46-126-25-13
always 잖 46-126-25-356
always 잗 46-126-35
always 잘 46-126-2
always 잙 46-126-2-1
always 잚 46-126-2-26
always 잛 46-126-2-12
always 잜 46-126-2-3
always 잝 46-126-2-236
always 잞 46-126-2-256
always 잟 46-126-2-356
always 잠 46-126-26
always 잡 46-126-12
always 잢 46-126-12-3
always 잣 46-126-3
always 잤 46-126-3-3
always 장 46-126-2356
always 잦 46-126-13
always 잧 46-126-23
always 잨 46-126-235
always 잩 46-126-236
always 잪 46-126-256
always 잫 46-126-356
always 재 46-1235
always 잭 46-1235-1
always 잮 46-1235-1-1
always 잯 46-1235-1-3
always 잰 46-1235-25
always 잱 46-1235-25-13
always 잲 46-1235-25-356
always 잳 46-1235-35
always 잴 46-1235-2
always 잵 46-1235-2-1
always 잶 46-1235-2-26
always 잷 46-1235-2-12
always 잸 46-1235-2-3
always 잹 46-1235-2-236
always 잺 46-1235-2-256
always 잻 46-1235-2-356
always 잼 46-1235-26
always 잽 46-1235-12
always 잾 46-1235-12-3
always 잿 46-1235-3
always 쟀 46-1235-3-3
always 쟁 46-1235-2356
always 쟂 46-1235-13
always 쟃 46-1235-23
always 쟄 46-1235-235
always 쟅 46-1235-236
always 쟆 46-1235-256
always 쟇 46-1235-356
always 쟈 46-345
always 쟉 46-345-1
always 쟊 46-345-1-1
always 쟋 46-345-1-3
always 쟌 46-345-25
always 쟍 46-345-25-13
always 쟎 46-345-25-356
always 쟏 46-345-35
always 쟐 46-345-2
always 쟑 46-345-2-1
always 쟒 46-345-2-26
always 쟓 46-345-2-12
always 쟔 46-345-2-3
always 쟕 46-345-2-236
always 쟖 46-345-2-256
always 쟗 46-345-2-356
always 쟘 46-345-26
always 쟙 46-345-12
always 쟚 46-345-12-3
always 쟛 46-345-3
always 쟜 46-345-3-3
always 쟝 46-345-2356
always 쟞 46-345-13
always 쟟 46-345-23
always 쟠 46-345-235
always 쟡 46-345-236
always 쟢 46-345-256
always 쟣 46-345-356
always 쟤 46-345-1235
always 쟥 46-345-1235-1
always 쟦 46-345-1235-1-1
always 쟧 46-345-1235-1-3
always 쟨 46-345-1235-25
always 쟩 46-345-1235-25-13
always 쟪 46-345-1235-25-356
always 쟫 46-345-1235-35
always 쟬 46-345-1235-2
always 쟭 46-345-1235-2-1
always 쟮 46-345-1235-2-26
always 쟯 46-345-1235-2-12
always 쟰 46-345-1235-2-3
always 쟱 46-345-1235-2-236
always 쟲 46-345-1235-2-256
always 쟳 46-345-1235-2-356
always 쟴 46-345-1235-26
always 쟵 46-345-1235-12
always 쟶 46-345-1235-12-3
always 쟷 46-345-1235-3
always 쟸 46-345-1235-3-3
always 쟹 46-345-1235-2356
always 쟺 46-345-1235-13
always 쟻 46-345-1235-23
always 쟼 46-345-1235-235
always 쟽 46-345-1235-236
always 쟾 46-345-1235-256
always 쟿 46-345-1235-356
always 저 46-234
always 적 46-234-1
always 젂 46-234-1-1
always 젃 46-234-1-3
always 전 46-234-25
always 젅 46-234-25-13
always 젆 46-234-25-356
always 젇 46-234-35
always 절 46-234-2
always 젉 46-234-2-1
always 젊 46-234-2-26
always 젋 46-234-2-12
always 젌 46-234-2-3
always 젍 46-234-2-236
always 젎 46-234-2-256
always 젏 46-234-2-356
always 점 46-234-26
always 접 46-234-12
always 젒 46-234-12-3
always 젓 46-234-3
always 젔 46-234-3-3
always 정 46-234-2356
always 젖 46-234-13
always 젗 46-234-23
always 젘 46-234-235
always 젙 46-234-236
always 젚 46-234-256
always 젛 46-234-356
always 제 46-1345
always 젝 46-1345-1
always 젞 46-1345-1-1
always 젟 46-1345-1-3
always 젠 46-1345-25
always 젡 46-1345-25-13
always 젢 46-1345-25-356
always 젣 46-1345-35
always 젤 46-1345-2
always 젥 46-1345-2-1
always 젦 46-1345-2-26
always 젧 46-1345-2-12
always 젨 46-1345-2-3
always 젩 46-1345-2-236
always 젪 46-1345-2-256
always 젫 46-1345-2-356
always 젬 46-1345-26
always 젭 46-1345-12
always 젮 46-1345-12-3
always 젯 46-1345-3
always 젰 46-1345-3-3
always 젱 46-1345-2356
always 젲 46-1345-13
always 젳 46-1345-23
always 젴 46-1345-235
always 젵 46-1345-236
always 젶 46-1345-256
always 젷 46-1345-356
always 져 46-156
always 젹 46-156-1
always 젺 46-156-1-1
always 젻 46-156-1-3
always 젼 46-156-25
always 젽 46-156-25-13
always 젾 46-156-25-356
always 젿 46-156-35
always 졀 46-156-2
always 졁 46-156-2-1
always 졂 46-156-2-26
always 졃 46-156-2-12
always 졄 46-156-2-3
always 졅 46-156-2-236
always 졆 46-156-2-256
always 졇 46-156-2-356
always 졈 46-156-26
always 졉 46-156-12
always 졊 46-156-12-3
always 졋 46-156-3
always 졌 46-156-3-3
always 졍 46-156-2356
always 졎 46-156-13
always 졏 46-156-23
always 졐 46-156-235
always 졑 46-156-236
always 졒 46-156-256
always 졓 46-156-356
always 졔 46-34
always 졕 46-34-1
always 졖 46-34-1-1
always 졗 46-34-1-3
always 졘 46-34-25
always 졙 46-34-25-13
always 졚 46-34-25-356
always 졛 46-34-35
always 졜 46-34-2
always 졝 46-34-2-1
always 졞 46-34-2-26
always 졟 46-34-2-12
always 졠 46-34-2-3
always 졡 46-34-2-236
always 졢 46-34-2-256
always 졣 46-34-2-356
always 졤 46-34-26
always 졥 46-34-12
always 졦 46-34-12-3
always 졧 46-34-3
always 졨 46-34-3-3
always 졩 46-34-2356
always 졪 46-34-13
always 졫 46-34-23
always 졬 46-34-235
always 졭 46-34-236
always 졮 46-34-256
always 졯 46-34-356
always 조 46-136
always 족 46-136-1
always 졲 46-136-1-1
always 졳 46-136-1-3
always 존 46-136-25
always 졵 46-136-25-13
always 졶 46-136-25-356
always 졷 46-136-35
always 졸 46-136-2
always 졹 46-136-2-1
always 졺 46-136-2-26
always 졻 46-136-2-12
always 졼 46-136-2-3
always 졽 46-136-2-236
always 졾 46-136-2-256
always 졿 46-136-2-356
always 좀 46-136-26
always 좁 46-136-12
always 좂 46-136-12-3
always 좃 46-136-3
always 좄 46-136-3-3
always 종 46-136-2356
always 좆 46-136-13
always 좇 46-136-23
always 좈 46-136-235
always 좉 46-136-236
always 좊 46-136-256
always 좋 46-136-356
always 좌 46-1236
always 좍 46-1236-1
always 좎 46-1236-1-1
always 좏 46-1236-1-3
always 좐 46-1236-25
always 좑 46-1236-25-13
always 좒 46-1236-25-356
always 좓 46-1236-35
always 좔 46-1236-2
always 좕 46-1236-2-1
always 좖 46-1236-2-26
always 좗 46-1236-2-12
always 좘 46-1236-2-3
always 좙 46-1236-2-236
always 좚 46-1236-2-256
always 좛 46-1236-2-356
always 좜 46-1236-26
always 좝 46-1236-12
always 좞 46-1236-12-3
always 좟 46-1236-3
always 좠 46-1236-3-3
always 좡 46-1236-2356
always 좢 46-1236-13
always 좣 46-1236-23
always 좤 46-1236-235
always 좥 46-1236-236
always 좦 46-1236-256
always 좧 46-1236-356
always 좨 46-1236-1235
always 좩 46-1236-1235-1
always 좪 46-1236-1235-1-1
always 좫 46-1236-1235-1-3
always 좬 46-1236-1235-25
always 좭 46-1236-1235-25-13
always 좮 46-1236-1235-25-356
always 좯 46-1236-1235-35
always 좰 46-1236-1235-2
always 좱 46-1236-1235-2-1
always 좲 46-1236-1235-2-26
always 좳 46-1236-1235-2-12
always 좴 46-1236-1235-2-3
always 좵 46-1236-1235-2-236
always 좶 46-1236-1235-2-256
always 좷 46-1236-1235-2-356
always 좸 46-1236-1235-26
always 좹 46-1236-1235-12
always 좺 46-1236-1235-12-3
always 좻 46-1236-1235-3
always 좼 46-1236-1235-3-3
always 좽 46-1236-1235-2356
always 좾 46-1236-1235-13
always 좿 46-1236-1235-23
always 죀 46-1236-1235-235
always 죁 46-1236-1235-236
always 죂 46-1236-1235-256
always 죃 46-1236-1235-356
always 죄 46-13456
always 죅 46-13456-1
always 죆 46-13456-1-1
always 죇 46-13456-1-3
always 죈 46-13456-25
always 죉 46-13456-25-13
always 죊 46-13456-25-356
always 죋 46-13456-35
always 죌 46-13456-2
always 죍 46-13456-2-1
always 죎 46-13456-2-26
always 죏 46-13456-2-12
always 죐 46-13456-2-3
always 죑 46-13456-2-236
always 죒 46-13456-2-256
always 죓 46-13456-2-356
always 죔 46-13456-26
always 죕 46-13456-12
always 죖 46-13456-12-3
always 죗 46-13456-3
always 죘 46-13456-3-3
always 죙 46-13456-2356
always 죚 46-13456-13
always 죛 46-13456-23
always 죜 46-13456-235
always 죝 46-13456-236
always 죞 46-13456-256
always 죟 46-13456-356
always 죠 46-346
always 죡 46-346-1
always 죢 46-346-1-1
always 죣 46-346-1-3
always 죤 46-346-25
always 죥 46-346-25-13
always 죦 46-346-25-356
always 죧 46-346-35
always 죨 46-346-2
always 죩 46-346-2-1
always 죪 46-346-2-26
always 죫 46-346-2-12
always 죬 46-346-2-3
always 죭 46-346-2-236
always 죮 46-346-2-256
always 죯 46-346-2-356
always 죰 46-346-26
always 죱 46-346-12
always 죲 46-346-12-3
always 죳 46-346-3
always 죴 46-346-3-3
always 죵 46-346-2356
always 죶 46-346-13
always 죷 46-346-23
always 죸 46-346-235
always 죹 46-346-236
always 죺 46-346-256
always 죻 46-346-356
always 주 46-134
always 죽 46-134-1
always 죾 46-134-1-1
always 죿 46-134-1-3
always 준 46-134-25
always 줁 46-134-25-13
always 줂 46-134-25-356
always 줃 46-134-35
always 줄 46-134-2
always 줅 46-134-2-1
always 줆 46-134-2-26
always 줇 46-134-2-12
always 줈 46-134-2-3
always 줉 46-134-2-236
always 줊 46-134-2-256
always 줋 46-134-2-356
always 줌 46-134-26
always 줍 46-134-12
always 줎 46-134-12-3
always 줏 46-134-3
always 줐 46-134-3-3
always 중 46-134-2356
always 줒 46-134-13
always 줓 46-134-23
always 줔 46-134-235
always 줕 46-134-236
always 줖 46-134-256
always 줗 46-134-356
always 줘 46-1234
always 줙 46-1234-1
always 줚 46-1234-1-1
always 줛 46-1234-1-3
always 줜 46-1234-25
always 줝 46-1234-25-13
always 줞 46-1234-25-356
always 줟 46-1234-35
always 줠 46-1234-2
always 줡 46-1234-2-1
always 줢 46-1234-2-26
always 줣 46-1234-2-12
always 줤 46-1234-2-3
always 줥 46-1234-2-236
always 줦 46-1234-2-256
always 줧 46-1234-2-356
always 줨 46-1234-26
always 줩 46-1234-12
always 줪 46-1234-12-3
always 줫 46-1234-3
always 줬 46-1234-3-3
always 줭 46-1234-2356
always 줮 46-1234-13
always 줯 46-1234-23
always 줰 46-1234-235
always 줱 46-1234-236
always 줲 46-1234-256
always 줳 46-1234-356
always 줴 46-1234-1235
always 줵 46-1234-1235-1
always 줶 46-1234-1235-1-1
always 줷 46-1234-1235-1-3
always 줸 46-1234-1235-25
always 줹 46-1234-1235-25-13
always 줺 46-1234-1235-25-356
always 줻 46-1234-1235-35
always 줼 46-1234-1235-2
always 줽 46-1234-1235-2-1
always 줾 46-1234-1235-2-26
always 줿 46-1234-1235-2-12
always 쥀 46-1234-1235-2-3
always 쥁 46-1234-1235-2-236
always 쥂 46-1234-1235-2-256
always 쥃 46-1234-1235-2-356
always 쥄 46-1234-1235-26
always 쥅 46-1234-1235-12
always 쥆 46-1234-1235-12-3
always 쥇 46-1234-1235-3
always 쥈 46-1234-1235-3-3
always 쥉 46-1234-1235-2356
always 쥊 46-1234-1235-13
always 쥋 46-1234-1235-23
always 쥌 46-1234-1235-235
always 쥍 46-1234-1235-236
always 쥎 46-1234-1235-256
always 쥏 46-1234-1235-356
always 쥐 46-134-1235
always 쥑 46-134-1235-1
always 쥒 46-134-1235-1-1
always 쥓 46-134-1235-1-3
always 쥔 46-134-1235-25
always 쥕 46-134-1235-25-13
always 쥖 46-134-1235-25-356
always 쥗 46-134-1235-35
always 쥘 46-134-1235-2
always 쥙 46-134-1235-2-1
always 쥚 46-134-1235-2-26
always 쥛 46-134-1235-2-12
always 쥜 46-134-1235-2-3
always 쥝 46-134-1235-2-236
always 쥞 46-134-1235-2-256
always 쥟 46-134-1235-2-356
always 쥠 46-134-1235-26
always 쥡 46-134-1235-12
always 쥢 46-134-1235-12-3
always 쥣 46-134-1235-3
always 쥤 46-134-1235-3-3
always 쥥 46-134-1235-2356
always 쥦 46-134-1235-13
always 쥧 46-134-1235-23
always 쥨 46-134-1235-235
always 쥩 46-134-1235-236
always 쥪 46-134-1235-256
always 쥫 46-134-1235-356
always 쥬 46-146
always 쥭 46-146-1
always 쥮 46-146-1-1
always 쥯 46-146-1-3
always 쥰 46-146-25
always 쥱 46-146-25-13
always 쥲 46-146-25-356
always 쥳 46-146-35
always 쥴 46-146-2
always 쥵 46-146-2-1
always 쥶 46-146-2-26
always 쥷 46-146-2-12
always 쥸 46-146-2-3
always 쥹 46-146-2-236
always 쥺 46-146-2-256
always 쥻 46-146-2-356
always 쥼 46-146-26
always 쥽 46-146-12
always 쥾 46-146-12-3
always 쥿 46-146-3
always 즀 46-146-3-3
always 즁 46-146-2356
always 즂 46-146-13
always 즃 46-146-23
always 즄 46-146-235
always 즅 46-146-236
always 즆 46-146-256
always 즇 46-146-356
always 즈 46-246
always 즉 46-246-1
always 즊 46-246-1-1
always 즋 46-246-1-3
always 즌 46-246-25
always 즍 46-246-25-13
always 즎 46-246-25-356
always 즏 46-246-35
always 즐 46-246-2
always 즑 46-246-2-1
always 즒 46-246-2-26
always 즓 46-246-2-12
always 즔 46-246-2-3
always 즕 46-246-2-236
always 즖 46-246-2-256
always 즗 46-246-2-356
always 즘 46-246-26
always 즙 46-246-12
always 즚 46-246-12-3
always 즛 46-246-3
always 즜 46-246-3-3
always 증 46-246-2356
always 즞 46-246-13
always 즟 46-246-23
